Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-373
Refunding bonds; objections; hearing; determination; appeal; procedure.

If, on the day appointed in such notice, any written objections be filed, the objection or objections shall be heard and decided by the board of supervisors of such drainage district. From its decision an appeal may be taken to the district court in the manner of appeals from the county board.

Laws 1929, c. 132, § 3, p. 485;

C.S.1929, § 31-473;

R.S.1943, § 31-373.